Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.130

Federal funds and programs—Payment of travel expenses of committees, councils, or other bodies.

Members of advisory committees, councils, or other bodies established to meet requirements of acts of congress may be paid travel expenses incurred pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended from such funds as may be available by legislative appropriation or as may otherwise be available as provided by law.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 97; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 17 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 41 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.